Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.350

Terms of sale must be made known.

In all cases of sales of property the terms shall be made known at the time, and if the premises consist of distinct farms or lots, they shall be sold separately or otherwise, if the court so directs.

[Code 1881 s 586; 1877 p 122 s 591; 1869 p 140 s 540; RRS s 872.]